Utah statutes.
78B-1-208.   Compensation of interpreter.

An interpreter appointed under this part is entitled to a reasonable fee for his or her services, including waiting time and reimbursement for necessary travel and subsistence expenses.  The fee shall be based on a fee schedule for interpreters recommended by the division of rehabilitation services or on prevailing market rates.  Reimbursement for necessary travel and subsistence expenses shall be at rates provided by law for state employees generally.  Compensation for interpreter services shall be paid by the appointing authority if the interpreter is not otherwise compensated for those services.

